Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1811
Inquest; arrest; when authorized.

If the person charged is present, the coroner may order his or her arrest by an officer or any other person present and shall then make a warrant requiring the officer or other person to take him or her before the county court for examination, or if the person charged is not present and the coroner believes the person can be taken, the coroner may issue a warrant to the sheriff requiring him or her to arrest the person and take the person charged before the county court for examination.

Laws 1879, § 106, p. 383;

R.S.1913, § 5673;

C.S.1922, § 5003;

C.S.1929, § 26-1512;

R.S.1943, § 23-1811;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 115;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 75;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 10.